Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3430
Presumptions not created.

The fact that a person has not appointed an attorney in fact or has not provided the attorney in fact with specific health care instructions shall create no presumptions regarding the person's wishes about health care.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 29.